Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 11 Adult-Oriented Establishment Registration Act of 1998
7-51-1110. Hearings on disciplinary actions — Judicial review — Prohibition on operation of business.

As used in this section, “application” means:

An application for a license;

An application for a permit;

An application for a license renewal; and

An application for a permit renewal.

Whenever an application is denied, the chair shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for such action; such notice shall also advise the applicant of the applicant's right to request a hearing before the board. All adult-oriented establishments, entertainers, employees, escorts, or operators who timely submit an application for renewal of an appropriate license or permit shall be granted a conditional license or permit maintaining the status quo pending review by the board and final judicial review by the trial court. If the applicant desires to request a hearing before the board to contest the denial of an application, such request shall be made in writing to the county mayor of such county within ten (10) days of the applicant's receipt of the notification of the denial of the application. If the applicant timely requests such a hearing, a public hearing shall be held within fifteen (15) days of the county mayor's receipt of such request before the board, at which time the applicant may present evidence as to why the application should not be denied. The board shall hear evidence concerning the basis for denial of the application and shall affirm or reverse the denial of an application at the conclusion of such hearing; any such hearing shall be concluded no later than twenty-two (22) days after the applicant's receipt of notification of denial of an application, unless an extension beyond such time period is requested by the applicant and granted by the board.

If the board affirms the denial of an application, the office of the county attorney for such county shall institute suit for declaratory judgment in a court of record in such county, within five (5) days of the date of any such denial seeking an immediate judicial determination of whether such application has been properly denied under the law.

The applicant shall be entitled to judicial determination of the issues within two (2) days after joinder of issue, and a decision shall be rendered by the court within two (2) days of the conclusion of the hearing. The applicant shall cooperate in expediting completion of service of process by the board when initiating a declaratory action under this part.

The board shall have the burden of showing that the denial of an application under this section is not arbitrary or capricious. If a denial of the application by the board is found by the court to be clearly erroneous, the court may overturn the action as being arbitrary or capricious.

The provisions of this part mandating judicial review shall control over general provisions for declaratory judgment actions in the event of any conflict.

This subsection (c) shall apply in any county that, pursuant to § 7-51-1120, adopts to make this part applicable in its county, unless the county legislative body of that county elects to have subsection (d) apply.

In any county in which the legislative body, in accordance with subdivision (d)(2), elects to make this subsection (d) applicable in its county, if the board affirms the denial of an application, the applicant may appeal the decision to a court of record in the county, within ten (10) days of any such affirmation, by common-law writ of certiorari. The applicant shall have the burden of showing to the court that the denial is illegal, arbitrary or capricious. If a court finds the board decision is clearly erroneous, the court may overturn the decision as being illegal, arbitrary or capricious.

The legislative body of any county that, pursuant to § 7-51-1120, adopts this part as being applicable in its county, shall also have the option of electing to make this subsection (d) applicable in its county. Any action by the county may be rescinded by the legislative body, in which case subsection (c) shall apply.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 10; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, §§ 6-8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2006, ch. 943, § 10; 2008, ch. 1085, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1998 amendments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1111. Termination and renewal of licenses — Applications — Fees.

Every license issued under this part will terminate at the expiration of one (1) year from the date of issuance, unless sooner revoked, and must be renewed before operation is allowed in the following year. Any operator desiring to renew a license shall make application to the board. The application for renewal must be filed not later than sixty (60) days before the license expires. The application for renewal shall be filed in triplicate with and dated by the board. A copy of the application for renewal shall be distributed promptly by the chair of the board to the applicable county sheriff. The application for renewal shall contain such information and data relevant to the renewal request, including information related to the applicant's qualifications or whether there are grounds for denial of renewal, and shall be given under oath or affirmation, as may be required by the board, but not less than the information contained in the original application.

A license renewal fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be submitted with the application for renewal. In addition to the renewal fee, a late penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be assessed against the applicant who files for a renewal less than thirty (30) days before the license expires. If the application is denied, one half (½) of the fee shall be returned.

If the sheriff's department is aware of any information bearing on the operator's qualifications, the information shall be filed in writing with the board not later than ten (10) days after the date of the application for renewal.

Every permit issued under this part will terminate at the expiration of one (1) year from the date of issuance, unless sooner revoked, and must be renewed before an entertainer is allowed to provide entertainment in an adult-oriented establishment in the following calendar year. Any entertainer desiring to renew a permit shall make application to the board. The application for renewal must be filed not later than thirty (30) days before the permit expires. The application for renewal shall be filed in triplicate with and dated by the board. A copy of the application for renewal shall be distributed promptly by the board to the sheriff. The application for renewal shall be upon a form provided by the board and shall contain such information and data relative to the renewal request, such as the applicant's qualifications, or whether there are grounds for denying the renewal, given under oath or affirmation, as may be required by the board.

A permit renewal fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be submitted with the application for renewal. In addition to the renewal fee, a late penalty of five dollars ($5.00) shall be assessed against the applicant who files for renewal less than thirty (30) days before the license expires. If the application is denied, one half (½) of the fee shall be returned.

If the sheriff's department is aware of any information bearing on the entertainer's qualifications, that information shall be filed in writing with the board not later than ten (10) days after the date of the application for renewal.

Notwithstanding anything in this part to the contrary, any application for renewal of a license or for renewal for a permit shall be handled, investigated, and approved or denied within the same time periods as those established in this part for original license applications and permit applications. In the event a license renewal application or permit renewal application is denied, the applicant shall have all rights of appeal to the board as set forth in § 7-51-1110.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 11; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, §§ 9, 10.

7-51-1112. Hours open for inspection.

The public portion of all adult-oriented establishments shall be open to inspection at all reasonable times by the applicable sheriff's department or such other persons as the board may designate.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 12; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1998 amendments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1113. Duties and responsibilities of operators, entertainers and employees.

The operator shall maintain a register of all employees, entertainers, or escorts, showing for each person the name, permit number issued under this part, any aliases used, home address, age, birth date, sex, height, weight, color of hair and eyes, telephone number, social security number, driver license number, date of employment and termination, and duties associated with the adult-oriented establishment. This information on each employee shall be maintained in the register on the premises for a period of three (3) years following termination.

The operator shall make the register of employees available immediately for inspection by the board or sheriff's department upon demand of a member of the board or sheriff's department at all reasonable times.

Every act or omission by an employee constituting a violation of this part shall be deemed the act or omission of the operator if such act or omission occurs either with the authorization, knowledge, or approval of the operator, or as a result of the operator's negligent failure to supervise the employee's conduct, and the operator shall be punishable for such act or omission in the same manner as if the operator committed the act or caused the omission.

An operator shall be responsible for supervising the conduct of all entertainers and employees while on the licensed premises, and shall exercise due diligence in taking reasonable efforts to prevent acts or omissions of any entertainers or employees constituting a violation of this part, with the operator's failure to reasonably fulfill this duty constituting a ground for determining whether the operator's license shall be revoked, suspended or renewed.

No employee of an adult-oriented establishment shall allow any minor to loiter around or to frequent an adult-oriented establishment or to allow any minor to view adult entertainment as defined in this part.

Every adult-oriented establishment shall be physically arranged in such a manner that the entire interior portion of the booths, cubicles, rooms or stalls, wherein adult entertainment is provided, shall be visible from the common area of the premises. Visibility shall not be blocked or obscured by doors, curtains, partitions, drapes or any other obstruction whatsoever.

The operator shall be responsible for and shall provide that any room or area used for the purpose of viewing adult-oriented motion pictures or other types of live adult entertainment shall be readily accessible at all times and shall be continuously opened to view in its entirety.

The license shall be conspicuously displayed in the common area of the premises at all times.

The permit shall be kept by an employee, entertainer, or escort so that it is readily available for display immediately upon request by any member of the county sheriffs department or other appropriate law enforcement official, any board member, or any person designated by the board to assist it in enforcing this part. Each employee, entertainer, or escort shall immediately display or disclose the employee, entertainer, or escort's valid permit number to any customer upon request.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 13; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 11; 2006, ch. 943, §§ 11-13.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1998 amendments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

Constitutionality of operator liability for employee conduct, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1114. Prohibited activities.

No operator, entertainer or employee of an adult-oriented establishment, either on the premises or in relation to the person's role as an operator, entertainer, or employee of an adult-oriented establishment, shall permit to be performed, offer to perform, perform, or allow patrons to perform sexual intercourse or oral or anal copulation or other contact stimulation of the genitalia.

No operator, entertainer or employee of an adult-oriented establishment shall encourage or permit any person upon the premises to touch, caress or fondle the breasts, buttocks, anus or genitals of any operator, entertainer or employee.

No entertainer, employee, or customer shall be permitted to have any physical contact with any other on the premises during any performance and all performances shall only occur upon a stage at least eighteen inches (18") above the immediate floor level and removed at least six feet (6') from the nearest entertainer, employee, or customer.

No employee or entertainer, while on the premises of an adult-oriented establishment, may:

Engage in sexual intercourse;

Engage in deviant sexual conduct;

Appear in a state of nudity; or

Fondle such person's own genitals or those of another.

For the purpose of this section, “nudity” means the showing of the human male or female genitals or pubic area with less than a fully opaque covering, the showing of the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any part of the nipple, or the showing of the covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state.

If the license holder operates an escort bureau, such bureau shall not be operated as a sexually-oriented escort bureau as defined in this part.

No permit holder of an escort bureau shall conduct oneself as a sexually-oriented escort as defined in this part.

No license holder shall advertise that such license holder offers sexual stimulation or sexual gratification as defined in this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 14; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 12.

Cross-References. Massage or exposure of erogenous areas, §39-17-918.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1998 amendments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1115. Entertainers or escorts — Permits — Required.

No person shall be an entertainer, employee, or escort in an adult-oriented establishment without a valid permit issued by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 15; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

7-51-1116. Entertainers or escorts — Permits — Application.

Any person desiring to secure a permit as an entertainer, employee, or escort shall make application to the board. The application shall be filed in triplicate with and dated by the board. A copy of the application shall be distributed promptly by the board to the sheriff's department.

The application for a permit shall be upon a form provided by the board. An applicant for a permit shall furnish the following information under oath:

Name and address, including all aliases;

Written proof that the individual is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

The applicant's height, weight, color of eyes and hair;

The adult-oriented establishment or similar business permit history of the applicant; whether such person, in previously operating in this or any other city or state under permit, has had such permit revoked or suspended, the reason for the revocation or suspension, and the business activity or occupation subject to such action of suspension or revocation;

Any conviction for or plea of nolo contendere to a specified criminal act, as defined in § 7-51-1102;

Two (2) portrait photographs at least two inches by two inches (2" x 2") of the applicant; and

A statement by the applicant that the applicant is familiar with this part and is in compliance with this part.

Within ten (10) days of receiving the results of the investigation conducted by the board or sheriff's department, the board shall notify the applicant that the applicant's application is granted, denied or held for further investigation. Such additional investigation shall not exceed an additional thirty (30) days unless otherwise agreed to by the applicant. Upon the conclusion of such additional investigations, the board shall advise the applicant in writing whether the application is granted or denied.

If an additional investigation is held that is not caused by actions of the applicant, upon the expiration of the thirtieth day from the filing of the application, the applicant shall be permitted conditionally to work as an entertainer, employee, or escort pending final judicial review by the trial court of a decision by the board to deny the application.

Failure or refusal of the applicant to give any information relevant to the investigation of the application, or the applicant's refusal or failure to appear at any reasonable time and place for examination under oath regarding the application, or the applicant's refusal to submit to or cooperate with any investigation required by this part, constitutes an admission by the applicant that the applicant is ineligible for such permit, and is grounds for denial thereof by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 16; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 13; 2006, ch. 943, §§ 14, 15.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of required disclosure of criminal convictions, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1117. Entertainers, employees or escorts — Permits — Qualifications — Investigations.

To receive a permit as an entertainer, employee or escort, an applicant must meet the following standards:

The applicant shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

The applicant shall not have had a permit revoked within two (2) years immediately preceding the date of the application;

The applicant shall not have been convicted of a specified criminal act, as defined in § 7-51-1102, for which:

Less than two (2) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a misdemeanor offense;

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction if the conviction is for a felony offense; and

Less than five (5) years have elapsed since the date of conviction for two (2) or more misdemeanor offenses occurring within any twelve-month period;

The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall have no effect on disqualification of the applicant;

An applicant who has been convicted of any specified criminal activities may not be denied a permit based on those convictions once the time period required in subdivision (a)(1)(C) has elapsed.

No permit shall be issued until the board or sheriff's department has investigated the applicant's qualifications to receive a permit. The results of that investigation shall be filed in writing with the board no later than thirty (30) days after the date of the application. The board shall only deny a permit application for reasons set forth in this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 17; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 14; 2006, ch. 943, § 16.

7-51-1118. Entertainers and escorts — Permits — Fees.

A license fee of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be submitted with the application for a license.

A permit fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be submitted with the application for a permit.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 18; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

7-51-1119. Penalties for violation of part.

A violation of this part shall, for a first offense, be a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by a fine only of five hundred dollars ($500), and shall result in the suspension or revocation of any license.

A second or subsequent violation of this part is a Class A misdemeanor, and shall result in the suspension or revocation of any license.

Each violation of this part shall be considered a separate offense, and any violation continuing more than one (1) hour of time shall be considered a separate offense for each hour of violation.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 19; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2005, ch. 439, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A and B misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

7-51-1120. Local approval required.

This part shall be local in effect and shall become effective in a particular county upon the contingency of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body adopting this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 432, § 21; 1998, ch. 1090, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of state legislature to regulate adult-oriented establishments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1121. Part not exclusive or preemptory of local laws or regulations.

Nothing in this part shall preempt or prevent political subdivisions in this state from enacting and enforcing other lawful and reasonable restrictions, regulations, licensing, zoning, and other criminal, civil or administrative provisions concerning the location, configuration, code compliance, or other business operations or requirements of adult-oriented establishments and sexually-oriented businesses. Except as specified in this part, such other lawful and reasonable restrictions, regulations, licensing, and other criminal, civil, or administrative provisions shall not be a basis for the board's denying, revoking, or suspending a license or permit under this part.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or any other law to the contrary, if a city or other political subdivision in this state chooses to enact and enforce its own regulatory scheme for adult-oriented establishments and sexually-oriented businesses, then this part shall not apply within the jurisdiction of such city or other political subdivision.

Acts 1998, ch. 1090, § 1; 2001, ch. 183, § 15.

7-51-1122. Criminal conviction record check.

The general assembly hereby declares that conducting a criminal conviction record check of an applicant desiring a license to operate an adult-oriented establishment is for a law enforcement purpose and that conducting a criminal conviction record check of applicants desiring a permit to perform as an entertainer at an adult-oriented establishment is also for a law enforcement purpose. Notwithstanding § 7-51-1121(b), or any other law to the contrary, those counties, cities or other political subdivisions that choose to license and regulate adult-oriented establishments and sexually-oriented businesses, either by adopting this part or by enacting and enforcing their own regulatory scheme that disqualifies an applicant for the conviction of a criminal act, shall require that all applicants for a license or permit to operate an adult-oriented establishment or to perform as an entertainer at an adult-oriented establishment shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the county, city or other political subdivision for positive identification of the applicant and the county, city or other political subdivision shall conduct a criminal conviction records check of the applicant.

Upon receipt of an application, the county, city or other political subdivision that licenses or permits operators or entertainers shall:

Conduct a criminal conviction record check through such computer terminals available to it or other means of access to criminal convictions that are maintained by the county, city or other political subdivision, the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation; and

Forward the applicant's fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation, which shall verify the identity of the applicant and shall conduct its own criminal conviction record check itself and forward the results of that investigation to the requesting county, city or other political subdivision.

If no disqualifying criminal conviction is identified by the county, city or other political subdivision or by the Tennessee bureau of investigation, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall forward a set of the applicant's fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for verification of the applicant's identity and request the federal bureau of investigation to conduct a criminal conviction record check investigation using the fingerprints.

The results of criminal conviction record investigations shall be used for the limited purpose of determining the applicant's qualifications for a license to operate an adult-oriented establishment or for a permit to perform as an entertainer at an adult-oriented establishment.

Fingerprints shall be submitted on authorized fingerprint cards or by electronic, machine-readable data, or other means approved by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation.

Any cost incurred in conducting such criminal conviction records investigations shall be paid by the county, city or other political subdivision making the request of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation. The county, city or other political subdivision may include such cost as part of any fee it charges for processing the applicant's license or permit.

Acts 2000, ch. 897, § 1.